Utah statutes.
31A-27a-502.   Recovery from affiliates.
(1) (a)  If a receivership order is entered under this chapter, the receiver
appointed under the receivership order may recover on behalf of the insurer
from an affiliate as defined in Subsection 31A-1-301(5) the value received by
the affiliate at any time during the five years preceding the filing date of
the delinquency proceedings.
(b)  A person disputing that person's status as an affiliate must prove by
clear and convincing evidence the person's nonaffiliate status.
(c)  Recovery from an affiliate is subject to the limitations of Subsections
(2) and (6).
(2)  If the insurer is a stock corporation, a stock dividend distribution to
an affiliate is not recoverable if the recipient shows by a preponderance of
the evidence that:
(a)  when paid, the stock dividend distribution to an affiliate is lawful and
reasonable;
(b)  the department had notice to and approved the stock dividend; and
(c)  the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known that the
stock dividend distribution to the affiliate might adversely affect the
solvency of the insurer.
(3)  The maximum amount recoverable under this section is the amount needed to
pay all claims under the receivership:
(a)  in excess of all other available recoverable assets; and
(b)  reduced for each recipient affiliate by any amount that the recipient
affiliate pays to any receiver under similar laws of other states.
(4) (a)  A person who is an affiliate at the time value is received is liable
up to the amount of value received by the affiliate.
(b)  If two or more affiliates are liable regarding the same value received,
they are jointly and severally liable.
(5)  If any affiliate liable under Subsection (4) is insolvent or unable to
pay within one year, all affiliates at the time the value is received are
jointly and severally liable for any resulting deficiency in the amount that
would have been recovered from the nonpaying affiliate.
(6)  This section does not enlarge the personal liability of a director under
existing law.
(7)  An action or proceeding under this section may not be commenced after the
earlier of:
(a)  six years after the day on which a receiver is appointed; or
(b)  the day on which the receivership is terminated.
